Hawaii statutes.
§603-12 Sessions, held where. Except
as otherwise provided by statute, the sessions of the circuit courts shall be
held as follows: In the first circuit, at Honolulu; in the second circuit, at
Wailuku; in the third circuit, at Hilo and Kona; in the fifth circuit, at
Lihue. [L 1892, c 57, §31; am L 1895, c 6, §1; am L 1903, c 32, §8; am L 1905,
c 34, §1 and c 56, §1; am L 1907, c 50, §1; am L 1911, c 126, §1; am L 1917, c
49, §1; am L 1919, c 27, §1; am L 1921, c 77, §1; RL 1925, §2244; RL 1935,
§3640; am L 1943, c 141, §1(b); RL 1945, §9638; RL 1955, §215-8; HRS §603-12;
am L 1972, c 88, §3(e); am L 1982, c 3, §1]

Rules of Court

As to where acts or proceedings may take place, see HRCP
rules 77(b), 82.

Case Notes

All sessions in term cases of first circuit court must be
held in Honolulu; parties' consent cannot confer extra-territorial
jurisdiction. 46 H. 197, 377 P.2d 609 (1962).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next